Utah statutes.
34-34-9.   Employer not to require person to abstain from union membership.

No employer shall require any person to abstain or refrain from membership in any labor union, labor organization or any other type of association as a condition of employment or continuation of employment.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

